North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-42 Tobacco Prevention and Control Program [Repealed]

23-42-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

I.M., approved November 4, 2008; repealed by 2017, ch. 193, § 4, effective July 1, 2017.

23-42-02.
Tobacco prevention and control advisory committee — Membership — Terms — Duties — Removal. [Repealed]

Source:

I.M., approved November 4, 2008; repealed by 2017, ch. 193, § 4, effective July 1, 2017.

23-42-03.
Executive committee. [Repealed]

Source:

I.M., approved November 4, 2008; repealed by 2017, ch. 193, § 4, effective July 1, 2017.

23-42-04.
Powers and duties of the executive committee. [Repealed]

Source:

I.M., approved November 4, 2008; 2013, ch. 213, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 193, § 4, effective July 1, 2017.

23-42-05.
Development of the comprehensive plan. [Repealed]

Source:

I.M., approved November 4, 2008; repealed by 2017, ch. 193, § 4, effective July 1, 2017.

23-42-06.
Conflict of interest. [Repealed]

Source:

I.M., approved November 4, 2008; repealed by 2017, ch. 193, § 4, effective July 1, 2017.

23-42-07.
Audit. [Repealed]

Source:

I.M., approved November 4, 2008; repealed by 2017, ch. 193, § 4, effective July 1, 2017.

23-42-08.
Biennial budget. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 15, § 40; repealed by 2017, ch. 193, § 4, effective July 1, 2017.